North Carolina, session 2025, SB644.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of one billion five hundred million
dollars ($1,500,000,000) in nonrecurring funds to be allocated to local school administrative units
on the basis of average daily membership to make improvements to public school buildings as
follows:
(1) One billion dollars ($1,000,000,000) to make needed improvements to all
school buildings for energy efficiency, including the following:
a. Installing high-efficiency lighting.
b. Replacing pipe insulation.
c. Weatherizing doors, windows, and other internal and external
openings.
d. Repairing, replacing, and upgrading heating, ventilation, and air
conditioning systems, including programmable thermostats, chillers,
boilers, and fuel-switching systems.
e. Upgrading plug load management systems.
f. Repairing, replacing, and upgrading water and wastewater systems
and controls.
g. Upgrading electric water coolers.
h. Installing open-platform, internet-based controls for building
management systems.
(2) Two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) to install solar photovoltaic
panels on each school building that would benefit from solar photovoltaic
panels and to make necessary roof repairs to support the installation of solar
photovoltaic panels.
(3) Two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) to replace all qualifying
school buses with new school buses that are operated exclusively on electric
fuel and assembled in the State. For purposes of this subdivision, a qualifying
school bus is a school bus owned by a local school administrative unit that
meets all of the following criteria:
*S644-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Is more than 10 years old by model year as of the effective date of this
act.
b. Is operated in whole or in part on motor fuel, as defined in
G.S. 105-449.60(31).
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 644-First Edition